test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-4-nakatîw_gt-norm.yaml
      # 1Sg
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: ka-nakatitân # I will leave you, I will leave you behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: ka-nakatak # I will leave him/her, I will leave him/her behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: ka-nakatitakwâw # I will leave you all, I will leave you all behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: ka-nakatakwâw # I will leave them, I will leave them behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO+Var/East: ka-nakataki # I will leave them, I will leave them behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: ka-nakatimak # I will leave another/others, I will leave another/others behind

      # 2Sg
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: ka-nakasiyan # you will leave me, you will leave me behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: ka-nakatat # you will leave him/her, you will leave him/her behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: ka-nakasiyâhk # you will leave us, you will leave us behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: ka-nakatacik # you will leave them, you will leave them behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: ka-nakatimat # you will leave another/others, you will leave another/others behind

      # 3Sg
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: ka-nakasiyan # you will leave me, you will leave me behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: ka-nakatisk # he/she will leave you, he/she will leave you behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: ka-nakasiyâhk # you will leave us, you will leave us behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO: ka-nakatikoyâhk # you will leave us, you will leave us behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO+Var/East: ka-nakasiyamiht # you will leave us, you will leave us behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: ka-nakatikoyahk # he/she will leave you and us, he/she will leave you and us behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO+Var/East: ka-nakatitahk # he/she will leave you and us, he/she will leave you and us behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: ka-nakatikoyîk # he/she will leave you all, he/she will leave you all behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO+Var/East: ka-nakatitîk # he/she will leave you all, he/she will leave you all behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: ka-nakatacik # you will leave them, you will leave them behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: ka-nakatimat # you will leave another/others, you will leave another/others behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: ka-nakatimât # he/she will leave yet another/others, he/she will leave yet another/others behind

      # 1Pl
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: ka-nakatitâhk # we will leave you, we will leave you behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: ka-nakatâyâhk # we will leave him/her, we will leave him/her behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO+Var/East: ka-nakatakiht # we will leave him/her, we will leave him/her behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: ka-nakatitâhk # we will leave you all, we will leave you all behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: ka-nakatâyâhkwâw # we will leave them, we will leave them behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO+Var/East: ka-nakatakihcik # we will leave them, we will leave them behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-nakatimâyâhk # we will leave another/others, we will leave another/others behind

      # 12Pl
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: ka-nakatâyahk # we and you will leave him/her, we and you will leave him/her behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO+Var/East: ka-nakatahk # we and you will leave him/her, we and you will leave him/her behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO: ka-nakatâyahkwâw # we and you will leave them, we and you will leave them behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East: ka-nakatahkwâw # we and you will leave them, we and you will leave them behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-nakatimâyahk # we and you will leave another/others, we and you will leave another/others behind

      # 2Pl
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO: ka-nakasiyîk # you all will leave me, you all will leave me behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: ka-nakatâyîk # you all will leave him/her, you all will leave him/her behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: ka-nakasiyâhk # you all will leave us, you all will leave us behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: ka-nakatâyîkwâw # you all will leave them, you all will leave them behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO+Var/East: ka-nakatâyîkok # you all will leave them, you all will leave them behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-nakatimâyîk # you all will leave another/others, you all will leave another/others behind

      # 3Pl
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO: [ka-nakasitwâw, ka-nakasicik] # they will leave me, they will leave me behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO: ka-nakatiskwâw # they will leave you, they will leave you behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: ka-nakatikoyâhkwâw # they will leave us, they will leave us behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO+Var/East: ka-nakasiyamihcik # they will leave us, they will leave us behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO: ka-nakatikoyahkwâw # they will leave you and us, they will leave you and us behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO+Var/East: ka-nakatitahkwâw # they will leave you and us, they will leave you and us behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: ka-nakatikoyîkwâw # they will leave you all, they will leave you all behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO+Var/East: ka-nakatitîkwâw # they will leave you all, they will leave you all behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-nakatâcik # they will leave another/others, they will leave another/others behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: ka-nakatimâcik # they will leave yet another/others, they will leave yet another/others behind

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: ka-nakatimit # another/others will leave me, another/others will leave me behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: ka-nakatimisk # another/others will leave you, another/others will leave you behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: ka-nakatikot # another/others will leave him/her, another/others will leave him/her behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: ka-nakatikoyâhk # another/others will leave us, another/others will leave us behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: ka-nakatikoyahk # another/others will leave you and us, another/others will leave you and us behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: ka-nakatikoyîk # another/others will leave you all, another/others will leave you all behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: ka-nakatikocik # another/others will leave them, another/others will leave them behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: ka-nakatâthit # another/others will leave yet another/others, another/others will leave yet another/others behind

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-nakatikothit # yet another/others will leave another/others, yet another/others will leave another/others behind

      # X
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1SgO: ka-nakatikawiyân # someone will leave me, someone will leave me behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2SgO: ka-nakatikawiyan # someone will leave you, someone will leave you behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3SgO: ka-nakatiht # someone will leave him/her, someone will leave him/her behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1PlO: ka-nakatikawiyâhk # someone will leave us, someone will leave us behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+12PlO: ka-nakatikawiyahk # someone will leave you and us, someone will leave you and us behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2PlO: ka-nakatikawiyîk # someone will leave you all, someone will leave you all behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3PlO: ka-nakatihcik # someone will leave them, someone will leave them behind
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+4Sg/PlO: ka-nakatimiht # someone will leave another/others, someone will leave another/others behind

      # 0Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: ka-nakatikoyân
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: ka-nakatikoyan
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: ka-nakatikot
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: ka-nakatikoyâhk
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: ka-nakatikoyahk
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: ka-nakatikoyîk
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: ka-nakatikocik
      PV/ka+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-nakatikothit
      

      # Inf # PV/ta

      # 1Sg
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: ta-nakatitân # I leave you, I leave you behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: ta-nakatak # I leave him/her, I leave him/her behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: ta-nakatitakwâw # I leave you all, I leave you all behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: ta-nakatakwâw # I leave them, I leave them behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO+Var/East: ta-nakataki # I leave them, I leave them behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: ta-nakatimak # I leave another/others, I leave another/others behind

      # 2Sg
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: ta-nakasiyan # you leave me, you leave me behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: ta-nakatat # you leave him/her, you leave him/her behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: ta-nakasiyâhk # you leave us, you leave us behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: ta-nakatacik # you leave them, you leave them behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: ta-nakatimat # you leave another/others, you leave another/others behind

      # 3Sg
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: ta-nakasiyan # you leave me, you leave me behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: ta-nakatisk # he/she leaves you, he/she leaves you behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: ta-nakasiyâhk # you leave us, you leave us behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO: ta-nakatikoyâhk # you leave us, you leave us behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO+Var/East: ta-nakasiyamiht # you leave us, you leave us behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: ta-nakatikoyahk # he/she leaves you and us, he/she leaves you and us behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO+Var/East: ta-nakatitahk # he/she leaves you and us, he/she leaves you and us behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: ta-nakatikoyîk # he/she leaves you all, he/she leaves you all behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO+Var/East: ta-nakatitîk # he/she leaves you all, he/she leaves you all behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: ta-nakatacik # you leave them, you leave them behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: ta-nakatimat # you leave another/others, you leave another/others behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: ta-nakatimât # he/she leaves yet another/others, he/she leaves yet another/others behind

      # 1Pl
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: ta-nakatitâhk # we leave you, we leave you behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: ta-nakatâyâhk # we leave him/her, we leave him/her behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO+Var/East: ta-nakatakiht # we leave him/her, we leave him/her behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: ta-nakatitâhk # we leave you all, we leave you all behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: ta-nakatâyâhkwâw # we leave them, we leave them behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO+Var/East: ta-nakatakihcik # we leave them, we leave them behind
      PV/ta+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: ta-nakatimâyâhk # we leave another/others, we leave another/others behind
